Wyoming, session 2025, SF0138.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) Not later than October 1, 2025, the Wyoming
energy authority shall complete a study on the economic
impact of energy and the energy industry in Wyoming. The
study shall include, at a minimum:
(i) General information on the various types of
mineral production and energy production and generation
that take place throughout the state;
(ii) A determination of the economic impact of
energy production in Wyoming, by:
(A) Each major region in Wyoming and the
state as a whole;
(B) Each individual type of energy or
mineral production.
(iii) The amount of state and local taxes that
Wyoming's energy producers and generators contribute on an
annual basis for each of the last ten (10) years;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0138
ENROLLED ACT NO. 43, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iv) The number of employees in Wyoming that
Wyoming's energy producers and generators have employed in
the state in each of the last ten (10) years;
(v) A measure of the amount in payroll that
Wyoming's energy producers and generators have paid out to
Wyoming employees and residents in each of the last five
(5) years;
(vi) A measure of other tangible and intangible
economic benefits and impacts that energy production and
the energy industry has had on Wyoming in the last five (5)
years;
(vii) A brief description of innovations in
energy that Wyoming producers and generators have developed
in the last ten (10) years;
(viii) Any other information that the Wyoming
energy authority deems necessary to quantify the impact of
energy on Wyoming's economy.
(b) The Wyoming energy authority may request the
assistance of any state agency and any higher education
institution in Wyoming in completing the study required by
this section. Upon receiving a request for assistance, each
state agency and institution of higher education shall
provide support and information to the Wyoming energy
authority.
(c) Not later than October 1, 2025, the Wyoming
energy authority shall submit a report of the study to the
joint appropriations committee, the joint revenue interim
committee and the joint minerals, business and economic
development interim committee.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0138
ENROLLED ACT NO. 43, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3